Maryland, session 2026, HB1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.5–118.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHILD CARE ENTITY” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT:
(I) PROVIDES CHILD CARE SERVICES; AND
(II) IS LICENSED OR REGULATED BY THE DIVISION.
(3) “DIVISION” MEANS THE DIVISION OF EARLY CHILDHOOD
DEVELOPMENT IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(4) “PROVIDER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS EMPLOYED BY,
CONTRACTS WITH, VOLUNTEERS FOR, OR OTHERWISE WORKS FOR A CHILD CARE
ENTITY.
(B) A PROVIDER SHALL COMPLETE THE TRAINING DESCRIBED UNDER §
5–716 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE:

HOUSE BILL 1034 3
(1) WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE INITIAL DATE OF EMPLOYMENT
WITH A CHILD CARE ENTITY; AND
(2) EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER.
(C) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, A CHILD
CARE ENTITY SHALL CERTIFY TO THE DIVISION THAT EACH PROVIDER IS IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(D) A PROVIDER WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN;
(2) SUSPENSION OR TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT; OR
(3) SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE PROVIDER’S LICENSE.
(E) A CHILD CARE ENTITY THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO
THE SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE CHILD CARE ENTITY’S LICENSE OR
REGISTRATION.
Article – Family Law
5–701.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in § 5–705.1 of this subtitle, in this subtitle the
following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) (1) “Educator or human service worker” means any professional employee
of any correctional, public, parochial or private educational, health, juvenile service, social
or social service agency, institution, or licensed facility.
(2) “Educator or human service worker” includes:
(i) any teacher;
(II) ANY PROVIDER, AS DEFINED IN § 9.5–118 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE;
[(ii)] (III) any counselor;
[(iii)] (IV) any social worker;
[(iv)] (V) any caseworker; and

HOUSE BILL 1034
[(v)] (VI) any probation or parole officer.
5–704.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including any law on privileged
communications, each health practitioner, police officer, educator, or human service
worker, acting in a professional capacity in this State who has reason to believe that a child
has been subjected to abuse or neglect:
(1) shall notify the local department or the appropriate law enforcement
agency; and
(2) if acting as a staff member of a hospital, public health agency, child care
institution, juvenile detention center, school, or similar institution, shall immediately
notify and give all information required by this section to the head of the institution or the
designee of the head.
5–716.
The Department shall post on its website a free online course on the identification,
prevention, and reporting of child abuse.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That an individual who is a
provider on July 1, 2026, for a child care entity, as defined in § 9.5–118 of the Education
Article as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall complete the training described under §
5–716 of the Family Law Article on or before January 1, 2027.
9.5–303.
(a) The State Board shall adopt regulations that relate to the registration of
family child care homes and large family child care homes.
(b) So far as practicable, the regulations shall be uniform with the rules and
regulations adopted by other State agencies as those rules and regulations relate to other
types of child care.
(c) At a minimum, the regulations shall provide for:
(10) A requirement that each registered child care provider shall hold a
current certificate indicating successful completion of approved:
(i) Basic first aid training through the American Red Cross or
through a program with equivalent standards; [and]
(ii) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training through the
American Heart Association or through a program with equivalent standards appropriate

HOUSE BILL 1034 5
for the ages of children for whom care is provided in the family child care home or large
family child care home; AND
(III) INSTRUCTION CONCERNING CHILD ABUSE DETECTION AND
REPORTING TO BE COMPLETED:
1. WITHIN 90 DAYS OF REGISTRATION; AND
2. ANNUALLY THEREAFTER;
9.5–404.
(a) The State Board shall adopt rules and regulations for licensing and operating
child care centers.
(b) These rules and regulations shall:
(3) Ensure the health of children in child care centers by:
(i) Monitoring children for signs and symptoms of child abuse;
(ii) Instructing licensees and staff concerning child abuse detection
and reporting TO BE COMPLETED:
1. WITHIN 90 DAYS OF STARTING EMPLOYMENT; AND
2. ANNUALLY THEREAFTER;
(iii) Monitoring health practices to help prevent the spread of disease;
(iv) Monitoring the care of infants and children with special needs;
and
(v) Prohibiting the administration of corporal punishment to
discipline a child;
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026.